en: Spinach young leaves, Baby spinach
da: babyspinat
fr: Jeunes pousses d'épinards pour salades
nl: Babyspinazie
sv: babyspenat

en: Frozen spinach young leaves
fr: Jeunes pousses d'épinards surgelées

en: Canned spinachs
bg: Консервиран спанак
de: Spinat in Dosen, Dosenspinat
es: Espinacas en conserva
fi: purkitetut pinaatit
fr: Épinards en conserve, Épinards appertisés
hr: Špinat iz konzerve
it: Spinaci in scatola
nl: Spinazie in blik/pot

en: Frozen spinachs, Frozen spinach
bg: Замразен спанак
de: Gefrorene Spinate
es: Espinacas congeladas
fi: pakastetut pinaatit
fr: Épinards surgelés
hr: Smrznuti špinat
it: Spinaci surgelati
nl: Diepvriesspinazies
pl: Szpinak mrożony

en: Frozen chopped spinachs
de: Gefrorene gehackte Spinate
es: Espinacas troceadas congeladas, Espinacas congeladas troceadas
fr: Épinards hachés surgelés
hr: Smrznuti nasjeckani špinat
nl: Diepvries gehakte spinazies

en: Frozen spinach leaves
bg: Замразен спанак на листа
de: Gefrorene Spinatblätter
es: Espinacas en hojas congeladas, Espinacas congeladas en hojas
fr: Feuilles d'épinard congelées
hr: Smrznuto lišće špinata
nl: Diepvries bladspinazies

en: Spinach with cream sauce
fr: Épinards à la crème
hr: Špinat s umakom od vrhnja
nl: Spinazies met room

en: Sweet potatoes, Sweet potato
bg: Сладки картофи
de: Süßkartoffeln
es: Batatas, Boniatos
fi: Bataatit
fr: Patates douces
hr: Slatki krumpir
it: Patate dolci
ja: サツマイモ, さつまいも, 薩摩芋
la: Ipomoea batatas
nl: Zoete aardappelen
pl: Bataty, Słodkie ziemniaki, Ziemniaki słodkie

en: Peeled sweet potatoes
nl: Zoete aardappelen (schoongemaakt)

en: Fresh sweet potatoes
nl: Zoete aardappelen (vers)

en: Cooked sweet potatoes
fr: Patates douces cuites
nl: Zoete aardappelen (gekookt)

en: Frozen sweet potatoes
fr: Patates douces surgelées
nl: Zoete aardappelen (diepvries)

en: Turnip, turnips
af: Raap
ar: لفت
az: Şalğam
be: Турнэпс
bg: ряпа
bn: শালগম
bo: ཉུང་མ།
br: Irvin
ca: nap
co: Navonu
cs: vodnice
cy: Erfinen
da: Majroe
de: Rübe, Mairüben, Speiserübe
el: ρέβα
eo: Rapo
es: naba, nabo
et: Naeris
eu: Arbi
fa: شلغم
fi: Nauris, peltokaali
fr: navet, navets
ga: Tornapa
gl: Nabo
gu: સલગમ
gv: Napin
he: לפת
hi: शलजम
hr: Repe, Repa
ht: Navè
hu: tarlórépa
io: Napo
is: Næpa
it: rape, capa, navone
ja: カブ
ka: ტურნეფსი
km: ಟರ್ನಿಪ್
ko: 순무
la: Brassica rapa subsp. rapa
lt: Ropė, Ropės
lv: turnepsis, rācenis
mk: репа
ml: മധുരമുള്ളങ്കി
nb: Vanlig nepe
ne: सलगम
nl: meiraap, knolraap
nv: Niłtsínii bikétłʼóól dijoolí
oc: Nap
os: Фосы булкъ
pa: ਸ਼ਲਗਮ
pl: Rzepa, Rzepa biała
pt: nabo, nabos
ro: Nap
ru: турнепс
sd: گوگڻو
sh: Repa
sk: okrúhlica
sl: repa
sv: Majrova
th: சிகப்பு முள்ளங்கி
tl: Puting singkamas
tr: Şalgam
uk: Турнепс
ur: شلغم
vi: Cải củ turnip
yi: ברוקווע
zh: 芜菁

en: Rutabaga, Swede
fr: Rutabaga

en: Cooked rutabaga, Cooked swede
fr: Rutabaga cuit

en: Cooked turnips
fr: Navets cuits

en: Peeled turnips
fr: Navets pelés

en: Fresh turnips
fr: Navets frais

en: Golden Ball turnips, Orange Jelly turnips, Golden Ball, Orange Jelly
fr: Navets jaune boule d'or, Navet jaune boule d'or, Navets jaunes

en: Mashua
fr: Capucine tubéreuse
la: Tropaeolum tuberosum